Utah statutes.
59-7-535.   Doing business thereafter -- Penalty.
(1)  Pursuant to any suspension or forfeiture under Section 59-7-534, any
person who attempts or purports to exercise any of the rights, privileges, or
powers of any suspended domestic corporation, or who transacts or attempts to
transact any intrastate business in this state in behalf of any forfeited
foreign corporation, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.  A fine shall be
imposed  of not less than $250, and a penalty of imprisonment shall be imposed
of not less than 50 days in the county jail.
(2)  Jurisdiction of the offense shall be in any county in which any part of
the attempted exercise of the powers, or any part of the transaction of
business occurred.
(3)  Any contract made in violation of this section is unenforceable by the
corporation or person.
